Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-131.01
Full and equal enjoyment of housing accommodations; statement of policy.

It is the intent of the Legislature that persons with disabilities shall be entitled to full and equal access to all housing accommodations offered for rent, lease, or compensation in this state.

Laws 1975, LB 83, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 932, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB248, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 9.